en: Sleds
xx: Sleds
cs: Sáňky
da: Kælke
de: Rodelschlitten
es: Trineos
fr: Traîneaux, Luge d'enfant (jouet), Luges d'enfant (jouet)
it: Slitte
ja: そり
nl: Sleetjes en sleden
no: Kjelker
pl: Sanki
pt: Trenós
ru: Сани и нарты
sv: Slädar
tr: Kızaklar

en: Snowshoeing
xx: Snowshoeing
cs: Chůze se sněžnicemi
da: Sneskovandring
de: Schneeschuhe & Zubehör
es: Caminar con raquetas de nieve
fr: Raquette à neige
it: Snowshoeing
ja: スノーシュー用品
nl: Op sneeuwschoenen lopen
no: Trugegåing
pl: Chodzenie z rakietami śnieżnymi
pt: Caminhadas com raquetes de neve
ru: Ходьба на снегоступах
sv: Snöskogång
tr: Kar Ayakkabılı Yürüyüş Sporu

en: Snowshoe Bindings
xx: Snowshoe Bindings
cs: Vázání na sněžnice
da: Sneskobindinger
de: Schneeschuh-Bindungen
es: Fijaciones de raquetas de nieve
fr: Fixations pour raquettes à neige
it: Attacchi racchette da neve
ja: スノーシュー用ビンディング
nl: Sneeuwschoenbindingen
no: Trugebindinger
pl: Wiązania do rakiet śnieżnych
pt: Amarrações para raquetes de neve
ru: Крепления для снегоступов
sv: Snöskobindningar
tr: Kar Ayakkabısı Bağlantıları

en: Snowshoes
xx: Snowshoes
cs: Sněžnice
da: Snesko
de: Schneeschuhe
es: Raquetas de nieve
fr: Raquettes à neige
it: Racchette da neve
ja: スノーシュー
nl: Sneeuwschoenen
no: Truger
pl: Rakiety śnieżne
pt: Raquetes de neve
ru: Снегоступы
sv: Snöskor
tr: Kar Ayakkabıları

en: Health & Beauty
xx: Health & Beauty
cs: Zdraví a krása
da: Sundhed og skønhed
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit
es: Salud y belleza
fr: Santé et beauté
it: Salute e bellezza
ja: 美容・健康
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging
no: Helse og skjønnhet
pl: Zdrowie i uroda
pt: Saúde e beleza
ru: Красота и здоровье
sv: Skönhet och hälsa
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik

en: Health Care
xx: Health Care
cs: Zdravotní péče
da: Sundhedspleje
de: Gesundheitspflege
es: Cuidado de la salud
fr: Santé
it: Salute
ja: ヘルスケア
nl: Gezondheidszorg
no: Helsepleie
pl: Opieka zdrowotna
pt: Cuidados com a saúde
ru: Медицинские средства
sv: Hälsovård
tr: Sağlık Hizmetleri

en: Acupuncture
xx: Acupuncture
cs: Akupunktura
da: Akupunktur
de: Akupunktur
es: Acupuntura
fr: Acupuncture
it: Agopuntura
ja: 鍼灸
nl: Acupunctuur
no: Akupunktur
pl: Akupunktura
pt: Acupuntura
ru: Иглоукалывание
sv: Akupunktur
tr: Akupunktur

en: Acupuncture Models
xx: Acupuncture Models
cs: Modely znázorňující akupunkturní body
da: Akupunkturmodeller
de: Akupunkturmodelle
es: Modelos de acupuntura
fr: Modèles d'acupuncture
it: Modelli agopuntura
ja: 鍼灸模型
nl: Acupunctuurmodellen
no: Akupunkturmodeller
pl: Modele do akupunktury
pt: Modelos de acupuntura
ru: Модели для иглоукалывания
sv: Akupunkturmodeller
tr: Akupunktur Modelleri

en: Acupuncture Needles
xx: Acupuncture Needles
cs: Jehly na akupunkturu
da: Akupunkturnåle
de: Akupunkturnadeln
es: Agujas de acupuntura
fr: Aiguilles d'acupuncture
it: Aghi per agopuntura
ja: 鍼灸針
nl: Acupunctuurnaalden
no: Akupunkturnåler
pl: Igły do akupunktury
pt: Agulhas de acupuntura
ru: Иглы для иглоукалывания
sv: Akupunkturnålar
tr: Akupunktur İğneleri

en: Bed Pans
xx: Bed Pans
cs: Podložní mísy
da: Bækkener
de: Bettpfannen
es: Cuñas
fr: Bassins de lit
it: Padelle da letto
ja: おまる
nl: Ondersteken
no: Stikkbekkener
pl: Baseny dla chorych
pt: Comadres
ru: Подкладные судна
sv: Stickbäcken
tr: Yatak Lazımlıkları

en: Biometric Monitor Accessories
xx: Biometric Monitor Accessories
cs: Měřiče tělesných funkcí – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til biometriske målere
de: Zubehör für biometrische Messgeräte
es: Accesorios para dispositivos biométricos
fr: Accessoires pour moniteurs biométriques
it: Accessori lettori biometrici
ja: 医療用測定器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor biometrische meters
no: Tilbehør for biometrisk overvåkning
pl: Akcesoria do monitorów funkcji życiowych
pt: Acessórios para monitor biométrico
ru: Принадлежности для биометрических систем
sv: Tillbehör till biometrimätare
tr: Biyometrik Monitör Aksesuarları

en: Activity Monitor Accessories
xx: Activity Monitor Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke krokoměrům
da: Tilbehør til aktivitetsmålere
de: Zubehör für Aktivitätsmonitore
es: Accesorios para monitores de actividad
fr: Accessoires pour moniteurs d'activité
it: Accessori per monitorare l'attività fisica
ja: 活動計測器具用関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor activiteitsmonitors
no: Tilbehør til aktivitetsovervåkere
pl: Akcesoria do monitorów aktywności
pt: Acessórios para monitores de atividade
ru: Принадлежности для мониторов активности
sv: Tillbehör till aktivitetsmonitor
tr: Aktivite Monitörü Aksesuarları

en: Blood Glucose Meter Accessories
xx: Blood Glucose Meter Accessories
cs: Glukometry – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til blodsukkermålere
de: Blutzuckermessung
es: Accesorios para medidores de glucosa en sangre
fr: Accessoires pour lecteurs de glycémie
it: Accessori per misurazione glicemia
ja: 血糖値測定器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor bloedglucosemeter
no: Tilbehør til blodsukkermålere
pl: Akcesoria do glukometrów
pt: Acessórios para medição de glicose
ru: Принадлежности для глюкометров
sv: Tillbehör till blodglykosmätare
tr: Şeker Ölçüm Cihazı Aksesuarları

en: Blood Glucose Control Solution
xx: Blood Glucose Control Solution
cs: Přípravky pro kontrolu krevního cukru
da: Kontrolvæske til blodsukker
de: Blutzucker-Kontrolllösung
es: Solución de control de glucosa en sangre
fr: Solution de contrôle de la glycémie
it: Soluzioni per il controllo della glicemia
ja: 血糖値測定器用コントロール液
nl: Vloeistof voor bloedsuikercontrole
no: Kontrolloppløsning for blodsukkermåling
pl: Roztwory kontrolne do glukometrów
pt: Solução de controle da glicose no sangue
ru: Растворы для контроля уровня глюкозы в крови
sv: Kontrollösning för blodglykos
tr: Kan Şeker Düzeyi Kontrol Çözümleri

en: Blood Glucose Test Strips
xx: Blood Glucose Test Strips
cs: Testovací proužky do glukometrů
da: Teststrips til blodsukker
de: Blutzuckerteststreifen
es: Tiras para prueba de glucosa en sangre
fr: Bandelettes de test de la glycémie
it: Strisce reattive per glicemia
ja: 血糖値検査紙
nl: Teststrips voor bloedglucose
no: Teststriper for blodsukkermåling
pl: Paski do glukometrów
pt: Tiras para teste de glicose
ru: Полоски для определения уровня глюкозы в крови
sv: Testremsor för blodglykos
tr: Şeker Test Stripleri

en: Lancing Devices
xx: Lancing Devices
cs: Odběrová pera
da: Lancetter
de: Stechhilfen
es: Lancetas
fr: Autopiqueurs
it: Pungidito
ja: ランセット
nl: Lancetapparaten
no: Lansetter
pl: Nakłuwacze
pt: Lancetadores
ru: Скарификаторы
sv: Lansetter
tr: İnsülin İğnesi

en: Blood Pressure Monitor Accessories
xx: Blood Pressure Monitor Accessories
cs: Monitory krevního tlaku – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til blodtryksmålere
de: Zubehör für Blutdrucküberwachungsgeräte
es: Accesorios para monitores de tensión arterial
fr: Accessoires pour tensiomètres
it: Accessori per misuratori di pressione sanguigna
ja: 血圧計関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor bloeddrukmonitoren
no: Tilbehør for blodtrykksmålere
pl: Akcesoria do ciśnieniomierzy
pt: Acessórios de monitoramento da pressão arterial
ru: Принадлежности для тонометров
sv: Tillbehör till blodtrycksmätare
tr: Tansiyon Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Blood Pressure Monitor Cuffs
xx: Blood Pressure Monitor Cuffs
cs: Manžety k monitorům krevního tlaku
da: Manchetter til blodtryksmålere
de: Blutdruckmanschetten
es: Manguitos para medición de tensión arterial
fr: Brassards de tensiomètres
it: Polsini per misuratori di pressione sanguigna
ja: 血圧計用腕帯
nl: Manchetten voor bloeddrukmonitoren
no: Mansjetter til blodtrykksmålere
pl: Rękawy do ciśnieniomierzy
pt: Braceletes de monitoramento da pressão arterial
ru: Манжеты для тонометров
sv: Blodtrycksmanschetter
tr: Tansiyon Aleti Kollukları

en: Body Weight Scale Accessories
xx: Body Weight Scale Accessories
cs: Osobní váhy – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til badevægte
de: Zubehör für Badezimmerwaagen
es: Accesorios para básculas de peso corporal
fr: Accessoires pour pèse-personnes
it: Accessori pesapersone
ja: 体重計関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor badkamerweegschaal
no: Tilbehør til personvekter
pl: Akcesoria do wag osobowych
pt: Acessórios para balança de banheiro
ru: Принадлежности для напольных весов
sv: Tillbehör till personvågar
tr: Tartı Aksesuarları

en: Biometric Monitors
xx: Biometric Monitors
cs: Měřiče tělesných funkcí
da: Biometriske målere
de: Medizinische Messgeräte
es: Dispositivos biométricos
fr: Moniteurs biométriques
it: Lettori biometrici
ja: 医療用測定器
nl: Biometrische meters
no: Biometriske overvåkningsapparater
pl: Monitory funkcji życiowych
pt: Monitores biométricos
ru: Биометрические мониторы
sv: Biometrimätare
tr: Biyometrik Monitörler